District of Columbia statutes.
44-1005.01

Rules.

The Mayor may issue rules, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History

Apr. 18, 1986, D.C. Law 6-108, § 501, 33 DCR 1510

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-1461.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority pursuant to Law 6-108, see Mayor’s Order 87-47, February 17, 1987.